Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB417.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 708(b), (c) and (d) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 708. Fort Indiantown Gap.* * *(b) Lease of installation.--(1) The Adjutant General is authorized to enter into agreements with the Federal Government and state governments for the purpose of permitting [soldiers] units under their command to use the real estate and equipment at Fort Indiantown Gap for military training purposes[.], for emergency response training and to support the quality of 12345678910111213141516171819 life of service members, veterans and their families.( 2) In addition to the authority of the State Armory Board under section 1509 (relating to r ental or lease of armories and of buildings or structures at Fort Indiantown Gap ) and to any other law relating to the leasing of Commonwealth property, the Adjutant General may lease any portion of the real property of Fort Indiantown Gap to an individual or a public or nonpublic entity, including a private commercial interest, to construct and operate a revenue-generating business that meets all of the following criteria:(i) The business benefits the residents of the local community in the vicinity of Fort Indiantown Gap and the personnel of Fort Indiantown Gap and their families.(ii) The business generates revenue for deposit into the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund established under subsection (f).(3) If the Adjutant General opts to lease any portion of the real property of Fort Indiantown Gap for the purpose specified under paragraph (2), the Adjutant General shall have the following duties:(i) Select a prospective lessee to construct and operate the revenue-generating business. In selecting a prospective lessee under this subparagraph, the Adjutant General shall consider all of the following:(A) The ability of the prospective lessee to provide an array of items or services as determined by the Adjutant General.(B) The degree to which the items or services offered by the prospective lessee benefit the 20250SB0417PN0351 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residents of the local community in the vicinity of Fort Indiantown Gap.(C) The degree to which the items or services offered by the prospective lessee benefit the personnel of Fort Indiantown Gap and their families.(D) The experience of the prospective lessee in operating the proposed type of revenue-generating business, giving greater weight to the number of years of experience, the number of years operating within this Commonwealth and the total number of similar businesses owned or operated by the prospective lessee.(ii) Establish the terms and conditions of the lease, including the period of the lease. The terms and conditions of the lease shall state that the lessee is required to operate a revenue-generating business during the period of the lease and the Commonwealth is not liable for a claim associated with the lessee or with the operation of the revenue-generating business.(4) The Adjutant General may delegate the duties specified under paragraph (2) or (3) to an employee or office of the department as the Adjutant General deems appropriate.(5) A determination by the Adjutant General or a delegate under paragraph (2) or (3), including a determination relating to the selection criteria for a prospective lessee, the selection of a lessee, expenditures or required forms or reports, shall not be subject to any of the following:(i) Administrative or judicial review under 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and 20250SB0417PN0351 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action) or 62 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 Subch. C (relating to Board of Claims).(ii) The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) The act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(v) The provisions of 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code).(6) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity for the purpose of 1 Pa.C.S. § 2310 (relating to sovereign immunity reaffirmed; specific waiver) or otherwise.(c) [Real] Purchase of real estate.--Upon the request of the Adjutant General and with the approval of the Governor, the Secretary of General Services is authorized to purchase lands adjacent to Fort Indiantown Gap and to accept on behalf of the department and the Commonwealth any improvements or appurtenances to the lands comprising the installation.(d) [Morale, recreation and welfare.--] Quality of life programs.--(1) The Adjutant General is authorized to operate facilities and organize activities and programs at Fort Indiantown Gap and at the department's facilities for the purpose of improving the [morale, welfare and] quality of life of service members,[ military dependents and veterans.] veterans and their families. The Adjutant General shall 20250SB0417PN0351 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 design the activities and programs to support military readiness through all of the following:(i) Physical fitness and well-being.(ii) Personal growth and development.(iii) Social interaction and camaraderie.(iv) Opportunities for leisure and recreation and discounts on travel, tickets and lodging.(2) The Adjutant General is [also] authorized to enter into concession agreements with private organizations for the continued operation of a canteen, exchange, commissary, restaurant or other enterprise which will improve the morale or welfare of [active, retired or reserve members.] service members, veterans and their families.(3) These operations, facilities, activities and programs must be financially self-sustaining, and any income, including fees and charges, derived from the concession agreements and the operation of the facilities, activities and programs shall be deposited by the Adjutant General [with a bank or trust company. Moneys in the account may only be used for the continued operation of the facilities, activities or programs at Fort Indiantown Gap. Any Federal funds specifically designated to assist the Adjutant General in implementing this subsection are hereby appropriated to the department for these purposes.] into the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund established under subsection (f).(4) No General Fund moneys or other State funds shall be used for the purposes authorized under this subsection. [An audit of all accounts under this subsection must be conducted annually on the State fiscal year basis, and the department 20250SB0417PN0351 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall provide a copy of the audit to the Secretary of the Budget.]* * *(f) Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund.--(1) The Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund is established as a restricted fund in the State Treasury. Revenue generated from lessees under subsection (b) shall be paid into the State Treasury and deposited into the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund.(2) The department may accept, on behalf of the Commonwealth, gifts, donations, legacies and usages of money from individuals, organizations, public or private corporations and other similar entities and solicit and raise money from public and private sources for the purpose of the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund. All money received and raised under this paragraph shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund.(3) The department shall expend money from the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund for the following purposes:(i) The continued operation of quality of life activities and programs in this Commonwealth that benefit service members, veterans and their families under subsection (d).(ii) The development of new activities and programs in this Commonwealth to benefit service members, veterans and their families under subsection (d).(iii) Grants to governmental and nonprofit organizations that provide activities and programs to 20250SB0417PN0351 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 benefit service members, veterans and their families under subsection (d).(iv) Provide morale, welfare and recreation support to Pennsylvania National Guard units deployed outside of this Commonwealth.(4) Money in the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes specified under paragraph (3).(5) No later than 60 days from the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall adopt a statement of policy for the maintenance and use of the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund and transmit the statement of policy to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The statement of policy adopted under this paragraph shall not be subject to any of the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The Regulatory Review Act.(g) Report.--No later than July 31, 2026, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives a report 20250SB0417PN0351 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 detailing the deposits and expenditures of the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund in the prior fiscal year and describing the activities and programs that received money from the Service Members, Veterans and their Families Fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0417PN0351 - 8 - 12345